prince/dictionaries/lt.aff
SFX E o       ančiosioms      o         
SFX E o       ančiąsias       o         
SFX E o       ančiosiomis     o         
SFX E o       ančiosiose      o         
SFX E i       intysis         [^s]i     
SFX E i       intįjį          [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiojo         [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiajam        [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiuoju        [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiajame       [^s]i     
SFX E i       intieji         [^s]i     
SFX E i       intiesiems      [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiųjų         [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiuosius      [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiaisiais     [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiuosiuose    [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčioji         [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiosios       [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiajai        [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiąją         [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiąja         [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiojoj        [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiojoje       [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiosioms      [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiąsias       [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiosiomis     [^s]i     
SFX E i       inčiosiose      [^s]i     
SFX E i       intysis         [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       intįjį          [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiojo         [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiajam        [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiuoju        [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiajame       [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       intieji         [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       intiesiems      [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiųjų         [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiuosius      [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiaisiais     [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiuosiuose    [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčioji         [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiosios       [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiajai        [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiąją         [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiąja         [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiojoj        [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiojoje       [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiosioms      [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiąsias       [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiosiomis     [^aoi]si  
SFX E i       inčiosiose      [^aoi]si  
SFX E 0       mas             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mo              [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mam             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mą              [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mu              [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mame            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mi              [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mų              [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miems           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mus             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mais            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       muose           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       ma              [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mos             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mai             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       moje            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       moj             [aoi]     
SFX E 0       moms            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       momis           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mose            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       masis           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mojo            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mąjam           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mąjį            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       muoju           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       majame          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mieji           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mųjų            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       miesiems        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       muosius         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       maisiais        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       muosiuose       [aoi]     
SFX E 0       moji            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mosios          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       majai           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mąją            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mąja            [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mojoje          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mojoj           [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mosioms         [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mąsias          [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mosiomis        [aoi]     
SFX E 0       mosiose         [aoi]     
