prince/dictionaries/lt.dic
administruoja/ESXfnv
adresuoja/ENXh
aiškinasi/E
aktyvuoja/ESX
analizuoja/ENXdfjprv
apgaudinėja/ENX
apvalina/ENXfklw
archyvuojasi/E
artėja/ENXjk
artinasi/E
asmenuoja/ENXdfv
aštrinasi/E
atostogauja/ENXfiv
auga/ENXabcdfhijkl
auklėjasi/E
aukština/ESXdfhjkprv
auna/ESXaemopqtv
aušina/ESXbfhi
aušta/ENXdi
automatizuojasi/E
autorizuojasi/E
baigiasi/E
baiginėjasi/E
baisėjasi/E
balnojasi/E
bandosi/E
baugina/ENXco
bėgioja/ENXdfknpqruv
bendradarbiauja/ENXf
bijo/ESXfrv
blausia/ESXm
blevyzgoja/ENXfirvx
blogina/ENXefkrvw
bloškia/ENXbegjq
braižo/ESXacdefhjknopqrtvx
brangina/ENXf
braška/ENXbcdfk
brauna/ESXcopstu
brėkšta/ENXi
brėžia/ENXabcefhlmoqrtx
bujoja/ESXdkl
būnasi/E
centruoja/ESXdk
charakterizuoja/ENX
dainuoja/ESXabcdefhklqruvw
dairosi/E
dalijasi/E
dalinasi/E
daro/ESXbcdfhijklnrtuvwx
daugėja/ENXf
dauginasi/E
daužosi/E
debiutuoja/ENX
dega/ENXacdefhijklopvx
deklamuoja/ESXfr
dekoduoja/ESXfv
dėkoja/ENXfn
dėliojasi/E
demaskuoja/ESX
dėmisi/E
dera/ESXejklpqvw
derėjosi/EP
derinasi/E
detektuoja/ENX
didina/ESXdfhlpr
diegia/ESXcdeoptjvw
diferencijuoja/ESXd
dingsta/ENXi
diskutuoja/ENXf
dokumentuoja/ENX
domina/ENXfk
domisi/E
draiko/ESXdfjkpv
draudžiasi/E
drebia/ESXacdefjlmoqrv
drebina/ESXfk
driekia/ESXepq
drįsta/ENXd
drumsčia/ESXkw
dubliuojasi/E
dūsta/ENXefjln
dvigubinasi/E
džiaugia/ESXamnrv
džiūgaujasi/E
eikvoja/ESXdhptw
eina/ESXabcdefghijklmnovwx
eksponuoja/ESXd
elgia/ESXr
eliminuoja/ESXfkw
emigruoja/ENX
erzina/ESXcfkow
esa/NE
evoliucionuojasi/E
faktorizuojasi/E
filmuoja/ESXdefhjnqv
filtruojasi/E
fokusuojasi/E
formuojasi/E
fotografuojasi/E
gabenasi/E
gailisi/E
galvojasi/E
gaminasi/E
garsinasi/E
gąsdinasi/E
gaubia/ESXacdmp
gaudo/ESXdfjkprvw
gaunasi/E
geidauja/ENXf
gelbstisi/E
generuoja/ESXfjkvw
gerbia/ENXf
gesina/ENXaejlx
gimdė/ENXbfjrv
gina/ESXabdelmnrv
ginčija/ESeXfpruvw
girdisi/E
giriasi/E
gydo/ESXadefjklprx
gyja/ENXabcdefjklo
gyvendina/ENXabcd
globoja/ENXf
grasinasi/E
grąžina/ENXkw
gražinasi/E
greitinasi/E
griaunasi/E
grindžia/ESXfr
grįžta/ESXgkmnq
grybauja/ENXefjnqrtv
grojasi/E
gulasi/E
guli/ESXbdefinvwx
gulisi/E
habilituoja/ENX
harmonizuojasi/E
identifikuojasi/E
ignoruoja/ENXfk
ilgėjasi/E
iliustruoja/ENXd
imasi/E
importuoja/ENXq
indeksuojasi/E
informuoja/ENXf
inicializuojasi/E
inicijuojasi/E
instaliuojasi/E
integruojasi/E
internacionalizuoja/ESX
interpretuoja/ESXfkq
invertuojasi/E
investuojasi/E
iriasi/E
išradinėja/ENX
izoliuoja/ENX
jaučiasi/E
juda/ENXbcdfk
judinasi/E
jungiasi/E
juokauja/ENXfnv
juosia/ESXaemptwx
kaba/ENXbdfv
kabinasi/E
kaito/ESX
kalasi/E
kalbasi/E
kalena/ENXbdfik
kankina/ESXdefjlnqrv
kapoja/ENXabcdefjklrvwx
kartojasi/E
kaupiasi/E
keikia/ESXabdiklpqruvw
kelia/ESXbcdefhjklnopqrtvwx
keliauja/ESXabdefgijv
kenčia/ENXabdefijmnv
kerpasi/E
keverzoja/ENXadfj
kilnoja/ESXbdefhjklnqvwx
kimbasi/E
kiša/ESXabcdefhijklnopqrtuvwx
kiškiakopūstėliauja/ESX
klaidžioja/ENXefinqrv
klampojasi/E
klausia/ENXadfhlnr
klauso/ESXdefhijnortvwx
klijuoja/ESXabcdefjklmnopqvwx
kliūna/ENXcfl
kloja/ESXabcdefhjklmnopqrtvwx
klonuoja/ESXfhjrv
klostosi/E
knapsi/ENXfk
kolekcionuoja/ENX
komentuoja/ENXbfjl
kompensuoja/ENX
kompiluojasi/E
komponuoja/ESXchkow
komutuoja/ENX
kondensuoja/ESXkw
kondicionuoja/ENX
konfigūruojasi/E
konstatuoja/ENX
konsultuojasi/E
kontaktuojasi/E
kontroliuojasi/E
koordinuojasi/E
kopiasi/E
kopijuojasi/E
koresponduoja/ENX
kraipo/ESXdfpruv
kramto/ESXadefhjk
kratosi/E
kreipia/ESXbdefhprtw
krenta/ENXabcdegijkl
kūrenasi/E
kviečiasi/E
laidojasi/E
laikosi/E
laipioja/ENXadfkv
laksto/ENXadfiknv
landžioja/ENXadf
lankosi/E
lankstosi/E
laukiasi/E
laužiasi/E
laužosi/E
lavinasi/E
legalizuojasi/E
leidžia/ESXabcdefhijklmnopqrtvwx
lemia/ENXe
lengvina/ESXfqr
lenkiasi/E
lepinasi/E
lėtina/ESXfhjkrtvx
liečiasi/E
liejasi/E
lietuvina/ENXkw
linksmina/ESXfinorv
linksta/ENXbcdefhkl
lipasi/E
lydi/ESXbdefgr
lyginasi/E
lyja/ENXacefhijkl
lokalizuoja/ESX
lošia/ESXabdfiknotx
lūžta/ENXabcdefhijkl
maišosi/E
maitinasi/E
manipuliuoja/ENX
maskuoja/ESXlx
mąsto/ENXafhkw
materializuojasi/E
matuoja/ESXabdfnprv
maudo/ESXdefpqrv
maunasi/E
medituoja/ENXf
mėgaujasi/E
mėginasi/E
meldžiasi/E
meluoja/ENXfjkmv
mergina/ENX
metasi/E
mėtosi/E
mezgasi/E
miegasi/E
mina/ESXbcdefgjklx
minga/ENXceikl
mirga/ENXek
myli/ESXforvw
modeliuoja/ENXfk
moka/ESXabcdfhjklmnpvwx
mokosi/E
montuoja/ESXbcdehjklnopqtvwx
moralizuoja/ENX
mušasi/E
naikina/ESXadefkrw
nakvoja/ENXfh
naudojasi/E
nebėra/ENXo
neina/ENX
nerimauja/ENX
nervinasi/E
nešiojasi/E
nyksta/ENXdeik
nori/ESXfovx
normalizuoja/ENX
numeruoja/ESXfhktw
nuodija/ESXadejlmpqx
nuomojasi/E
okupuoja/ENXv
optimizuojasi/E
orientuoja/ESXhtvw
paiso/ENX
paišosi/E
pakuojasi/E
parduoda/ENXdhp
pasakojasi/E
pažįsta/ESXbdjmvw
pelnosi/E
perisi/E
piešia/ESXacdefhijlnoqrtv
pietauja/ENXf
piktnaudžiauja/ENXf
pildosi/E
pilotuojasi/E
pykstasi/E
pypteli/ENX
pjaunasi/E
pjaustosi/E
plakasi/E
planuojasi/E
platinasi/E
plauna/ESXadefhijkmpqrtuvw
plečia/ESXdfipru
ploja/ESXacfijklovw
populiarėja/ENXd
poruojasi/E
prašo/ESXdfjklnoprtvwx
prausia/ESXabdemnpq
priešinasi/E
prognozuoja/ENXd
projektuoja/ESX
protestuoja/ENXl
puola/ENXabcdefgijklx
pustosi/E
ragauja/ESXdfntv
raišioja/ESXabefhjklqrvx
rakina/ESXbjklnvwx
randa/ESXbdiknpsw
rašo/ESXabcdefhjklmopqrtvwx
rauna/ESXabcdefhijklnopqrstuvwx
reaguoja/ENXk
redaguoja/ENXfk
redukuojasi/E
registruojasi/E
reguliuojasi/E
reiškia/ESXadfmpr
rėkia/ENXadfhlp
remia/ESXabcfjklnorwx
remontuoja/ESXfkrvw
rengiasi/E
renkasi/E
rėpia/ENXal
replikuojasi/EP
reprezentuojasi/E
rezervuojasi/E
ribojasi/E
rikiuoja/ESXdfhjkptvw
rimsta/ENXaef
rišasi/E
ryškėja/ENXdfk
ryškinasi/E
ryžtasi/E
rodosi/E
ruošia/ESXacdfjkmoprvw
rūpi/ENXf
rūpinasi/E
rūšiuojasi/E
šąla/ENXabcdefhjkl
šaldosi/E
sąlygoja/ENX
saugosi/E
šaukiasi/E
sėda/ESXacdefhjklnovx
sėdi/ESXbdfinopqrvx
sega/ESXabcdejklnopqvwx
sekasi/E
semia/ESXadefjklprvw
sensta/ENXefhk
servina/ENXfk
šiaušia/ESXbfkwx
sieja/ESXbknw
siekia/ENXfjw
šifruojasi/E
simbolizuojasi/E
sinchronizuojasi/E
siūlosi/E
siuva/ESXabcdefhjklmnoprtvwx
šypso/ESXqrv
skaičiuojasi/E
skaidosi/E
skaitinėjasi/E
skaitosi/E
skambina/ESXafhjnrvw
skelbia/ESXafmr
skenuojasi/E
skerdžiasi/E
skiriasi/E
skirstosi/E
sklaido/ESXdfhipru
sklando/ENXef
skleidžiasi/E
skliaudžiasi/E
skolinasi/E
skuba/ENXbcdefgjkl
skundžiasi/E
skutasi/E
slenkasi/E
slepiasi/E
sliuogia/ENXcdefhijl
slysta/ENXcdefi
šluojasi/E
smerkia/ENXf
smunka/ENXacdikl
šnekasi/E
sninga/ENXafijlo
sodina/ESXabcefhjklmnoqrtvwx
šokinėja/ENXabcdefghijklnpruvx
sotinasi/E
spalvoja/ENeXf
spaudinėja/ENXabcdefjklmqrvwx
spaudžiasi/E
specializuoja/ESX
spėja/ENXbcehk
spirgina/ENXafjr
stabdosi/E
stabilizuojasi/E
standartizuojasi/E
stato/ESXabcdefhjklmnoqrtvwx
stebi/ESXfnq
steigia/ESXcjov
stengia/ESXcrt
stingsta/ENXakq
stiprinasi/E
stojasi/E
stovisi/E
studentauja/ESXbfhjlnoqrstuvwx
studijuoja/ENXbdfipr
stumiasi/E
suka/ESXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
šūkauja/ENXfirw
sukinėjasi/E
sumuojasi/E
suokia/ENXflov
supaprastina/ENX
svaičioja/ESXcfhijkloprtuv
svaigsta/ENXa
švaistosi/E
svarsto/ENXafh
švelnina/ENXfk
sveriasi/E
šviečiasi/E
švinta/ENXeik
švirkščiasi/E
svyra/ENXef
taiko/ESXbcefjklqrvw
taiso/ESXabcdefjklmnorvwx
talpina/ENXfkrw
tamposi/E
tariasi/E
tarnauja/ENXabdfilnx
teikia/ESXcefhkoqt
teiraujasi/E
teisinasi/E
telkia/ESXkw
telpa/ENXcik
temsta/ENXajkl
tenkina/ESXfr
tepasi/E
terliojasi/E
terpia/ENXco
teršiasi/E
testuoja/ESXdf
tiekia/ENXjrw
tikina/ENXcfo
tikrinasi/E
tikslina/ESXfkorw
tildo/ENXefjlrvx
tingi/ESXfijpv
tinka/ENXabcdefjklnrw
tiriasi/E
tyčiojasi/E
tobulina/ESXdfr
toleruoja/ENX
transliuoja/ENXh
tranzuoja/ESXabdefgkvw
traukia/ESXabcdefghijklmnopqrvwx
traukinėja/ENXabcdefhjklnprvwx
trenkiasi/E
trikdosi/E
trinka/ENXk
trukdosi/E
trūksta/ENXbcdefhijkl
trumpinasi/E
trupa/ENXabcdejk
tuokiasi/E
turisi/E
turtina/ENXfiv
tuština/ESXadfp
tveria/ESXabcdefhklmnoqrtwx
tvindo/ENXfjlvx
tvirtina/ESXcfjklorvwx
vadinasi/E
vagia/ENXadefjmqrv
vaizduoja/ENXbfnov
validuoja/ENX
varo/ESXabcdefghjklmnoqsuvw
vartojasi/E
važinėjasi/E
vedasi/E
veja/ESXabcdefgjmnopqrvw
vėluoja/ENXfklv
verdasi/E
verta/ENXeq
veržiasi/E
vienija/ESXakw
viliojasi/E
virškinasi/E
vysto/ESXacdefhkp
žada/ENXbfjlnoprvw
žalojasi/E
žengia/ENXbcdefhqu
žinosi/E
žygiuojasi/E
žudo/ESXdeinpqu
žvalgosi/E
žvygauja/ENXfk
